Florida, session 2026, SB300.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 37 38 Section 1.âParagraph (a) of subsection (1) of section 39 45.031, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 40 45.031âJudicial sales procedure.âIn any sale of real or 41 personal property under an order or judgment, the procedures 42 provided in this section and ss. 45.0315-45.035 may be followed 43 as an alternative to any other sale procedure if so ordered by 44 the court. 45 (1)âFINAL JUDGMENT.â 46 (a)âIn the order or final judgment, the court shall direct 47 the clerk or the alternative auctioneer authorized under s. 48 45.0311 to sell the property at public sale on a specified day 49 that may not shall be not less than 20 days or more than 35 days 50 after the date thereof, on terms and conditions specified in the 51 order or judgment. A sale may be held more than 35 days after 52 the date of final judgment or order if the plaintiff or 53 plaintiffâs attorney consents to such time. The final judgment 54 must shall contain the following statement in conspicuous type: 55 56 IF THIS PROPERTY IS SOLD AT PUBLIC AUCTION, THERE MAY 57 BE ADDITIONAL MONEY FROM THE SALE AFTER PAYMENT OF 58 PERSONS WHO ARE ENTITLED TO BE PAID FROM THE SALE 59 PROCEEDS PURSUANT TO THIS FINAL JUDGMENT. 60 61 IF YOU ARE A SUBORDINATE LIENHOLDER CLAIMING A RIGHT 62 TO FUNDS REMAINING AFTER THE SALE, IF ANY, YOU MUST 63 FILE A CLAIM WITH THE CLERK NO LATER THAN THE DATE 64 THAT THE CLERK REPORTS THE FUNDS AS UNCLAIMED. IF YOU 65 FAIL TO FILE A TIMELY CLAIM, YOU WILL NOT BE ENTITLED 66 TO ANY REMAINING FUNDS. 67 68 Section 2.âSection 45.0311, Florida Statutes, is created to 69 read: 70 45.0311âMandatory requirements for judicial foreclosure 71 sales.â 72 (1)âThe Legislature finds that a deviation from the 73 judicial sales procedures under s. 45.031 may be beneficial in 74 certain foreclosure proceedings due to the nature of the real or 75 personal property being sold under an order or a final judgment 76 in order to maximize the potential sales proceeds, including the 77 net proceeds thereof, for the benefit of all parties. The 78 Legislature further finds that transparency is necessary for all 79 alternative judicial sales procedures to prevent overreach by 80 any party, to avoid fraud, and to maximize the sales price while 81 minimizing expenses and delays. The Legislature further finds 82 that a person who facilitates alternative sales or handles 83 deposits or sales proceeds, including surplus proceeds, must be 84 qualified, independent, and not related to any party or an 85 attorney for a party and must be subject to this section and the 86 jurisdiction of the court. 87 (2)âAs used in this section, the term ârelativeâ means an 88 individual related to another as father, mother, son, daughter, 89 brother, sister, uncle, aunt, first cousin, nephew, niece, 90 husband, wife, father-in-law, mother-in-law, son-in-law, 91 daughter-in-law, brother-in-law, sister-in-law, stepfather, 92 stepmother, stepson, stepdaughter, stepbrother, stepsister, half 93 brother, or half sister. 94 (3)âIn a foreclosure action, the court may not approve a 95 request from a party to deviate substantially from the judicial 96 sales procedures of s. 45.031, except as provided in this 97 section. 98 (4)âA party requesting a deviation must request the relief 99 clearly in a separate motion. If the party requesting the 100 deviation is not the owner of record or the plaintiff, he or she 101 must attach to the motion a separate written consent to the 102 deviation from the plaintiff. The written consent from the 103 plaintiff required by this subsection must be notarized or 104 verified, be contemporaneous to the motion requesting a 105 deviation, and reference the motion in the consent. The court 106 may not hear a motion requesting a deviation which lacks the 107 written consent required by this subsection. If the party 108 requesting the deviation is the plaintiff, the owner of record 109 may object within 10 days after the courtâs approval of an 110 alternative sale and the clerk must be appointed to conduct the 111 sale in accordance with s. 45.031. If the party requesting the 112 deviation is the owner of record, the plaintiff may object 113 within 10 days after the courtâs approval of an alternative sale 114 and the clerk must be appointed to conduct the sale in 115 accordance with s. 45.031. Any deviation authorized by the court 116 must be set forth in writing in the final judgment of 117 foreclosure or other order. 118 (5)âA trial court ordering an alternative sale in 119 accordance with this section shall adhere to all of the 120 following requirements: 121 (a)âOnly one set of bidding procedures may apply to a sale 122 of real or personal property. Each bidder must follow the same 123 procedures and receive the same information relating to the 124 sale. Preferences or advantages may not be given to any party, 125 person, or bidder. 126 (b)âThe publication of the notice of sale must meet or 127 exceed the requirements of s. 45.031(2). 128 (c)âCredit bid rights must be limited to the amount owed to 129 the plaintiff as provided in the order or final judgment that 130 determined such amount. Any bid by the plaintiff in excess of 131 the amount awarded to the plaintiff in the order or final 132 judgment must be paid in cash. 133 (d)âThe highest bidder, inclusive of both a credit bid and 134 a cash bid, wins the bid. The deadline for payment of the 135 winning bid may not exceed 5 business days. 136 (e)âAn in-person auction must be conducted in a place that 137 is open to the general public at the time of the auction and 138 that is reasonably accessible and may not be conducted outside 139 of the county where the foreclosure action is pending. 140 (f)âAn electronic sale by an alternative auctioneer must be 141 conducted in accordance with s. 45.031(10) and meet the 142 following requirements: 143 1.âAny person seeking to bid electronically online must 144 register. To register, a person must provide information 145 relevant for the auction to properly identify the bidder, 146 contact the bidder, and complete the sale of the property as 147 determined by the alternative auctioneer. If the person 148 registering to bid is an individual, the information required 149 must include at least the individualâs name, e-mail address, and 150 telephone number. If the person registering to bid is an entity, 151 the information required must include the entityâs legal name, 152 the name of an individual who serves as the contact person for 153 the entity, and his or her e-mail address and telephone number. 154 2.âThe identity of each online bidder must be verified by 155 the alternative auctioneer before a bid may be placed online. 156 The identification verification process may include verification 157 through a government-issued identification card, biometric 158 identification, or another method of verification as determined 159 by the judge or alternative auctioneer. If the bidderâs identity 160 cannot be verified, the bidder may not participate in the online 161 sale. 162 3.âThe purchaser at sale must submit all of the following 163 information to the alternative auctioneer before the sale is 164 finalized: 165 a.âAny information required by the alternative auctioneer, 166 to be checked against the Office of Foreign Assets Control of 167 the United States Department of the Treasury sanction list 168 before finalizing the purchase of the property. The alternative 169 auctioneer shall check the winning purchaser against the 170 sanction list before an order approving such sale may be 171 entered. 172 b.âIf the purchaser is an individual, the individualâs 173 name, physical mailing address, e-mail address, and any other 174 information requested by the alternative auctioneer in order to 175 adequately identify and contact the purchaser. 176 c.âIf the purchaser is an entity, the entityâs legal name, 177 trade name if different from its legal name, state and date of 178 formation, mailing address, proof of business registration with 179 the Department of State, the name of an individual contact 180 person for the entity, and his or her e-mail address and 181 telephone number. 182 (g)âAny person holding funds must have insurance or post 183 sufficient bond to protect the interests of the parties. 184 (h)âCosts, fees, and service charges that are payable to 185 the clerk of the court may not be waived. 186 (i)âThe 10-day period to object to the sale as provided in 187 s. 45.031(5), and the confirmation of the sale as provided in s. 188 45.031(6), may not be altered. 189 (j)âThe requirements related to a foreclosure surplus in 190 ss. 45.031(1), 45.032, 45.033, and 45.035(2) may not be waived. 191 (k)âThe clerk in the county in which the action is pending 192 remains responsible for filing the certificate of sale in 193 accordance with s. 45.031(4), the certificate of title in 194 accordance with s. 45.031(5), and the disbursement of proceeds 195 in accordance with s. 45.031(7) and for handling surplus funds 196 in accordance with ss. 45.032 and 45.033. The clerk shall 197 receive the allowable service charge as imposed in s. 45.035 for 198 recording, certifying the sale, and handling proceeds that must 199 be assessed as costs. 200 (6)âIf a party requests that the court authorize someone 201 other than the clerk of the court or the sheriff to conduct the 202 sale, the request must be clearly stated in the motion 203 requesting deviation. The party requesting deviation must 204 identify an alternative auctioneer to oversee the sale. An 205 alternative auctioneer shall: 206 (a)âBe licensed either as an auctioneer under part IV of 207 chapter 468, or a real estate broker or brokerage licensed under 208 chapter 475 and be in good standing for the preceding 5 years. 209 (b)âHave insurance or post a bond filed with and payable to 210 the clerk of court to protect the interests of the parties. The 211 court shall set the amount of the bond as the approximate value 212 of the property to be sold. An attorney in the action may not be 213 the auctioneer. The auctioneer must recuse himself or herself if 214 a business partner or relative within the third degree of 215 consanguinity registers or attempts to bid. 216 (c)âBe an independent third party and may not be: 217 1.âA party to the action, an attorney representing a party 218 to the action, or an employee of a party or the attorney of a 219 party to the action. 220 2.âA relative of a party to the action; an employee, an 221 officer, a director, an affiliate, or a subsidiary thereof; or a 222 relative, an employee, an officer, a director, or an affiliate 223 or associate of an attorney representing a party to the action. 224 3.âIn any financial relationship to the action, to the real 225 or personal property being sold, or to a party, attorney, or 226 relative other than the payment of the fees for providing the 227 sale services. 228 (d)âRequire a deposit and final payment from the successful 229 high bidder in accordance with s. 45.031(3). 230 (e)âProvide the required sale information and results to 231 the clerk in the county in which the action is pending no later 232 than 2 business days after the conclusion of the sale so that 233 the clerk may file the certificate of sale in accordance with s. 234 45.031(4). 235 (f)âProvide the clerk in the county in which the action is 236 pending the required sale information so that the clerk may file 237 and record the certificate of title in accordance with s. 238 45.031(5) and (6). 239 (g)âTimely provide the proceeds of the sale to the clerk in 240 the county in which the action is pending so the clerk may 241 disburse the proceeds in accordance with s. 45.031(7). 242 (h)âVerify information as required by subparagraph (5)(f)2. 243 for an online sale. 244 (7)âA person harmed by a willful violation of this section 245 has a cause of action for damages resulting from the violation. 246 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.